Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1356
Violation; penalty.

(1) A person who violates section 28-1355 shall be guilty of a Class III felony; however, such person shall be guilty of a Class IB felony if the violation is based upon racketeering activity which is punishable as a Class I, IA, or IB felony.

(2) In lieu of the fine authorized by section 28-105, any person convicted of engaging in conduct in violation of section 28-1355, through which pecuniary value was derived, or by which personal injury or property damage or other loss was caused, may be sentenced to pay a fine that does not exceed three times the gross value gained or three times the gross loss caused, whichever is greater, plus court costs and the costs of investigation and prosecution reasonably incurred. Any fine collected under this subsection shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 10;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 28-1356 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 10, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.